build/hi_android/engnoun.lexc
!!!engnoun.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols [stem] +N +V +Sg +Pl +PREP +ADV +A +Aux +RPRO
+Relative +NEG [Guess] +CON +fwConsonant +fwVowel +Indef +DET

LEXICON Root

Noun ;

LEXICON Noun

[Guess] Constant;
contact Ninf;
name Ninf;
first Ninf;
last Ninf;
help Ninf;
a Constant;

LEXICON Constant
[stem]+CON:0	#;

LEXICON Ninf

[stem]+N+Sg:0   #;
[stem]+N+Pl:^s  #;
